Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska12-915
Bylaws; adoption.

The board of trustees of the cemetery district may adopt such bylaws as may be deemed necessary for the government of said district.

Laws 1961, c. 27, § 7, p. 141.